Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.220

Livestock inspection—Fee schedule—Certificates. (Effective until July 1, 2026.)

(1) Except as provided for in RCW 16.65.090 and otherwise in this section, the fee for livestock inspection is $4 per head for cattle and $3.85 for horses, with a call out fee of $20.

(2) When cattle are identified with the owner's brand, electronic official individual identification, or other form of identification specified by the director by rule, the fee for livestock inspection is $1.21 per head, with a call out fee of $20.

(3) No inspection fee is charged for a calf that is inspected before moving out-of-state under an official temporary grazing permit if the calf is part of a cow-calf unit and the calf is identified with the owner's Washington-recorded brand or other form of identification specified by the director by rule.

(4) The fee for inspection of cattle at a processing plant with a daily capacity of no more than 500 head of cattle where the United States department of agriculture maintains a meat inspection program is $4.40 per head, with a call out fee of $20.

(5) When a single inspection certificate is issued for 30 or more horses belonging to one person, the fee for livestock inspection is $2.20 per head, with a call out fee of $20.

(6) The fee for individual identification certificates is $22 for an annual certificate and $63 for a lifetime certificate, with a call out fee of $20. However, the fee for an annual certificate listing 30 or more animals belonging to one person is $5.50 per head, with a call out fee of $20. A lifetime certificate shall not be issued until the fee has been paid to the director.

(7) The minimum fee for the issuance of an inspection certificate by the director is $5.50. The minimum fee does not apply to livestock consigned to a public livestock market or special sale or inspected at a cattle processing plant.

(8) No call out fee is charged for an inspection done by a certified veterinarian or field livestock inspector.

[ 2023 c 46 s 3; 2019 c 92 s 5; 2010 c 66 s 7; 2006 c 156 s 1; 2003 c 326 s 24; 1997 c 356 s 3; 1997 c 356 s 2; 1995 c 374 s 49; (1995 c 374 s 48 expired July 1, 1997). Prior: 1994 c 46 s 25; 1994 c 46 s 19; 1993 c 354 s 8; 1981 c 296 s 17; 1971 ex.s. c 135 s 5; 1967 c 240 s 35; 1959 c 54 s 22.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2023 c 46 ss 1, 3, 5, and 6: See note following RCW 16.57.015.

Expiration date—2023 c 46; 2022 c 158; 2019 c 92 ss 1, 5, 8, and 11: See note following RCW 16.57.015.

Effective date—2006 c 156: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 1, 2006." [ 2006 c 156 s 4.]

Effective dates—1997 c 356: "(1) Sections 2, 4, 6, 8, and 10 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 1997.

(2) Sections 3, 5, 7, 9, and 11 of this act take effect July 1, 1998." [ 1997 c 356 s 12.]

Effective date—Expiration date—1995 c 374 ss 48, 49, 56, and 57: "(1) Sections 49 and 57 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1997.

(2) Sections 48 and 56 of this act shall expire July 1, 1997." [ 1995 c 374 s 58.]

Effective date—1994 c 46 ss 21-25: See note following RCW 16.65.090.

Effective date—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Prior legislative approval—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 16.65.030.

Severability—1981 c 296: See note following RCW 15.08.010.

PDFRCW 16.57.220

Livestock inspection—Fee schedule—Certificates. (Effective July 1, 2026.)

(1) Except as provided for in RCW 16.65.090 and otherwise in this section, the fee for livestock inspection is one dollar and sixty cents per head for cattle and three dollars and fifty cents for horses or the time and mileage fee, whichever is greater.

(2) When cattle are identified with the owner's brand or other form of identification specified by the director by rule, the fee for livestock inspection is one dollar and ten cents per head or the time and mileage fee, whichever is greater.

(3) No inspection fee is charged for a calf that is inspected before moving out-of-state under an official temporary grazing permit if the calf is part of a cow-calf unit and the calf is identified with the owner's Washington-recorded brand or other form of identification specified by the director by rule.

(4) The fee for inspection of cattle at a processing plant with a daily capacity of no more than five hundred head of cattle where the United States department of agriculture maintains a meat inspection program is four dollars per head.

(5) When a single inspection certificate issued for thirty or more horses belonging to one person, the fee for livestock inspection is two dollars per head or the time and mileage fee, whichever is greater.

(6) The fee for individual identification certificates is twenty dollars for an annual certificate and sixty dollars for a lifetime certificate or the time and mileage fee, whichever is greater. However, the fee for an annual certificate listing thirty or more animals belonging to one person is five dollars per head or the time and mileage fee, whichever is greater. A lifetime certificate shall not be issued until the fee has been paid to the director.

(7) The minimum fee for the issuance of an inspection certificate by the director is five dollars. The minimum fee does not apply to livestock consigned to a public livestock market or special sale or inspected at a cattle processing plant.

(8) For purposes of this section, "the time and mileage fee" means seventeen dollars per hour and the current mileage rate set by the office of financial management.

[ 2010 c 66 s 7; 2006 c 156 s 1; 2003 c 326 s 24; 1997 c 356 s 3; 1997 c 356 s 2; 1995 c 374 s 49; (1995 c 374 s 48 expired July 1, 1997). Prior: 1994 c 46 s 25; 1994 c 46 s 19; 1993 c 354 s 8; 1981 c 296 s 17; 1971 ex.s. c 135 s 5; 1967 c 240 s 35; 1959 c 54 s 22.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 156: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 1, 2006." [ 2006 c 156 s 4.]

Effective dates—1997 c 356: "(1) Sections 2, 4, 6, 8, and 10 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 1997.

(2) Sections 3, 5, 7, 9, and 11 of this act take effect July 1, 1998." [ 1997 c 356 s 12.]

Effective date—Expiration date—1995 c 374 ss 48, 49, 56, and 57: "(1) Sections 49 and 57 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1997.

(2) Sections 48 and 56 of this act shall expire July 1, 1997." [ 1995 c 374 s 58.]

Effective date—1994 c 46 ss 21-25: See note following RCW 16.65.090.

Effective date—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Prior legislative approval—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 16.65.030.

Severability—1981 c 296: See note following RCW 15.08.010.